Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20203-408
Violations; penalty.

Any person, firm, or corporation (1) violating any of the provisions of sections 3-401 to 3-409, (2) submitting false information in the application for a permit, (3) violating any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated by the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation pursuant to sections 3-401 to 3-409, (4) failing to do and perform any act required by sections 3-401 to 3-409, or (5) violating the terms of any permit issued pursuant to sections 3-401 to 3-409, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Each day any violation continues or any structure erected in violation of sections 3-401 to 3-409 shall continue in existence shall constitute a separate offense.

Laws 1955, c. 7, § 8, p. 70;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 31;

Laws 2015, LB469, § 7;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 70.